Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 1
CITY HOUSING LAW - SLUM CLEARANCE

29-4-101. Short title.

This part 1 shall be known and may be cited as the "City Housing Law".

Source:

L. 35:

p. 498, § 1.

CSA:

C. 82, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-1.

29-4-102. Legislative declaration.

It is hereby declared:

That unsanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations exist in the various cities and that such unsafe or unsanitary conditions arise from overcrowding and concentration of population, the obsolete and poor condition of the buildings, improper planning, excessive land coverage, lack of proper light, air, and space, unsanitary design and arrangement, lack of proper sanitary facilities, and the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes;

That in all such cities persons of low income are forced to reside in unsanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations; that in various cities there is a lack of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations available to all the inhabitants thereof, and that consequently persons of low income are forced to occupy overcrowded and congested dwelling accommodations;

That these conditions cause an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the health, safety, morals, and welfare of the citizens of the state and impair economic values; that these conditions cannot be remedied by the ordinary operations of private enterprises;

That the clearance, replanning, and reconstruction of areas in which unsanitary or unsafe housing conditions exist and the providing of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations, at such rentals that persons who now live in unsafe or unsanitary dwelling accommodations or in overcrowded and congested dwelling accommodations can afford to live in safe or sanitary or uncongested dwelling accommodations, are public uses and purposes for which public money may be spent and private property acquired;

That in order to remedy these conditions it is necessary that the powers provided in this part 1 be conferred upon each city; that it is in the public interest that work on such projects be instituted as soon as possible in order to relieve unemployment which now constitutes an emergency.

The necessity in the public interest for the provisions enacted in this part 1 is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 498, § 2.

CSA:

C. 82, § 5.

L. 37:

p. 656, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-2.

L. 61:

p. 419, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-2.

29-4-103. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authority" or "housing authority" means an authority established in accordance with the provisions of part 2 of this article and any amendments or supplements thereto.

"Bonds" means bonds, interim receipts, or other obligations of a city issued by its council pursuant to this part 1 or pursuant to any other law as supplemented by or in conjunction with this part 1.

"City" means any city or incorporated town which is included within the boundaries of a housing authority.

"Community facilities" means real and personal property, buildings and equipment for recreational or social assemblies, for educational, health, or welfare purposes, and necessary utilities, when designed primarily for the benefit and use of the occupants of dwelling accommodations.

"Contract" means any agreement of a city with or for the benefit of an obligee whether contained in a resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, lease, bond, or other instrument.

"Council" means the council, legislative body, board of commissioners, board of trustees, or other body, board, or commission charged with the governing of any city.

"Federal government" means the United States, the federal emergency administration of public works, or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States.

"Government" means the state and federal governments and any subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them.

"Housing project" means all real and personal property, buildings and improvements, stores, offices, lands for farming and gardening, and community facilities acquired, constructed, or to be acquired or constructed pursuant to a single plan or undertaking to demolish, clear, remove, alter, or repair unsafe, unsanitary, or substandard housing or to provide dwelling accommodations at rentals within the means of persons of low income. The term "housing project" also means the planning of the buildings and improvements, the acquisition of property, the demolition of existing structures, the construction, reconstruction, alteration, and repair of the improvements, and all other work in connection therewith.

"Law" means any act or statute, general, special, or local, of the state, including, without being limited to, the charter of any city.

"Mortgage" means deeds of trust, mortgages, building and loan contracts, or other instruments conveying real or personal property as security for bonds and conferring a right to foreclose and cause a sale thereof.

"Obligee of the city" or "obligee" means any bondholder, trustee for any bondholders, any lessor demising property to the city used in connection with a housing project, or any assignee of such lessor's interest or any part thereof, and the United States, when it is a party to any contract with the city.

"Real property" means lands, lands under water, structures, and any easements, franchises, and incorporeal hereditaments and every estate and right therein, legal and equitable, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise.

"State" means the state of Colorado.

"Trust indenture" means instruments pledging the revenues of real or personal properties but not conveying such properties or conferring a right to foreclose and cause a sale thereof.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 500, § 3.

CSA:

C. 82, § 6.

L. 37:

p. 658, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-3.

L. 61:

p. 420, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-3.

29-4-104. Powers of cities to undertake projects.

Every city has power and is authorized:

To construct any housing project within the city;

To contract debts for the construction of any housing project within the city, to borrow money, to issue its bonds to finance such construction, and to provide for the rights of obligees as provided in this part 1;

To assess, levy, and collect unlimited ad valorem taxes on all property subject to taxation to pay the bonds and the interest thereon issued to finance any housing project of the city, and to pay the obligations incurred by the city in connection with any lease to it of a housing project or of real or personal property for the purposes of a housing project;

To acquire by purchase, gift, or the exercise of the power of eminent domain and to hold and dispose of any property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, or any right or interest in any such property in connection with any housing project of the city, whether subject to mortgages, liens, charges, or other encumbrances;

To enter on any lands, buildings, or property for the purpose of making surveys, soundings, and examinations in connection with the planning or construction of any housing project of the city;

To insure or provide for the insurance of any housing project of the city against such risks as the city may deem advisable and to procure or agree to the procurement of insurance or guarantees from a government of the payment of any debts or parts thereof incurred by the city in connection with a housing project, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance;

To borrow money and accept grants from the federal government for or in aid of the construction of a housing project of the city; to take over any land acquired by the federal government for the construction of a housing project; to take over or lease any housing project constructed or owned by the federal government in the city; and to such ends to enter into such contracts, mortgages, trust indentures, leases, or other agreements as the federal government may require including an agreement that the federal government has the right to supervise and approve the construction, maintenance, and operation of such housing project;

All cities are authorized to take over any housing project constructed or owned by the federal government located within ten miles of the boundaries of said city, provided said project is not located within any other city, town, county, or city and county without the prior approval of the governing body of such other city, town, county, or city and county. The authority in this subparagraph (II) conferred to all such cities shall be in addition to all of the authorities and powers in this part 1 granted to cities and shall include, without restrictions, the right to enter into leases for the land upon which said housing projects are located. Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this part 1, said cities may operate, maintain, rent, and terminate the housing projects taken over in such manner and upon such terms as their city councils or other governing bodies, by a majority vote thereof, may determine, subject only to the terms and conditions imposed by the federal government at the time the projects are taken over but without restriction as to the method and manner of operation provided in this part 1.

To exercise, for the purpose of obtaining from the federal government a grant, loan, or other financial assistance or cooperation in the construction, maintenance, and operation of a housing project of the city, any power conferred by this part 1 independently or in conjunction with any other power conferred by this part 1 or conferred by any other law; and to do all things necessary in order to secure such aid, assistance, or cooperation from the federal government;

To act as agent for the federal government in connection with the acquisition or construction of a federal housing project or any part thereof;

To arrange with a government or an authority, upon such terms and for such consideration as it may determine, for the acquisition by such government or authority of property, options, or property rights, or for the furnishing of property or services, in connection with a housing project of the city;

To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this part 1.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this part 1 or in any other law, a city may include in any contract let in connection with a housing project stipulations requiring that the contractor and any subcontractors comply with requirements as to minimum wages and maximum hours of labor, and comply with any conditions which the federal government may have attached to its financial aid of the housing project.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 502, § 4.

CSA:

C. 82, § 7.

L. 37:

p. 661, § 3.

L. 53, 1st Ex. Sess.:

p. 21, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-4.

29-4-105. Eminent domain.

Every city has the right to acquire by eminent domain any property, real or personal, which it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this part 1 after the adoption by it of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the property described therein is in the public interest and necessary for public use. Every city may exercise the power of eminent domain pursuant to the provisions of either sections 38-1-101 to 38-1-115, article 3 of title 38, and section 38-5-106 or article 6 of title 38, C.R.S.

Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired, but no property belonging to any government may be acquired without its consent and no property belonging to a public utility corporation may be acquired without the approval of the public utilities commission or other officer or tribunal having regulatory power over such corporation.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 504, § 5.

CSA:

C. 82, § 8.

L. 37:

p. 663, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-5.

29-4-106. Acquisition of land for government.

A city may acquire by purchase or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any property, real or personal, which it may deem necessary for any housing project being constructed or operated by a government or an authority. The city, upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration as it may determine, may convey title or deliver possession of such property so acquired or purchased to such government or authority for use in connection with such housing project.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 505, § 6.

CSA:

C. 82, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-6.

29-4-107. Management of housing projects.

The city shall deliver possession of any housing projects constructed, acquired, or leased by it to the authority within the boundaries of which the city is included, but the title to all property comprising such housing projects shall remain in the city. The authority shall operate and maintain all such housing projects of the city and shall fix, levy, and collect such rents, fees, or other charges for the use and occupancy of such housing projects as such authority determines; but if there are any agreements of the city with an obligee, the authority shall fix, levy, collect, and revise such rents, fees, and other charges in accordance with such agreements and subject thereto. All rents, fees, and other charges received by the authority from any such housing project shall not be commingled with any moneys of the authority and shall be deposited in a special account in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S.

After the payment of the cost of operation and maintenance of such housing project, the net receipts of such project shall be paid by the authority to the city at monthly or longer intervals as the city may determine or at such intervals as shall be provided for in any agreement by the city with an obligee.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 505, § 7.

CSA:

C. 82, § 10.

L. 37:

p. 664, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-7.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1617, § 13, effective June 8.

29-4-108. Moneys of city.

All proceeds received from the sale of the bonds, all moneys received from the federal government, and all revenues received by any city from any housing project shall be paid to the financial officer of the city designated for such purposes, who shall not commingle any such money received with any other moneys but shall deposit same in a separate account in the name of the city in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 506, § 8.

CSA:

C. 82, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-8.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1617, § 14, effective June 8.

29-4-109. Construction contracts and costs.

Any contract for the construction of a housing project or any part thereof may be awarded by the city upon any day at least five days, excluding Sundays, after at least one publication of notice requesting bids upon such contract in a newspaper circulating in the city, or if there is no such newspaper, after a posting of such notice in three public places in such city on a date at least five days previous to the award of such contract.

In determining the cost of any housing project, the following items may be included as a part of the cost of such housing project and financed by the issuance of bonds:

Engineering, inspection, accounting, fiscal, and legal expenses;

The cost of issuance of the bonds, including engraving, printing, advertising, accounting, and other similar expenses;

Any interest costs on money borrowed or estimated to be borrowed during the period of construction of the housing project and for six months thereafter.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 507, § 10.

CSA:

C. 82, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-9.

29-4-110. Bonds secured by taxes - maturity.

The council shall submit to an election the question of the authorization of the issuance of bonds payable from taxes or additionally secured by taxes. Such bonds shall mature at such times, not exceeding fifteen years from their respective dates, as the council provides. Such election shall be called by the council which shall adopt a resolution, called the "election resolution" in this section, which shall state in substance:

The amount or maximum amount of bonds to be issued;

The housing project for the financing of which such bonds are to be issued;

The rate or maximum rate of interest which such bonds are to bear;

A brief concise statement, which need not go into any detail other than the mere statement of the fact, showing whether such bonds will be payable from taxes, be additionally secured by a pledge of the revenues or a mortgage on any housing project, or be payable from taxes only in the event of a deficiency in the revenues or other sources of payment;

The date on which such election will be held;

The places where votes may be cast; and

The hours between which such polling places will be open.

Such election resolution shall be published in full at least once, not less than ten days nor more than thirty days prior to the date fixed for such election, in a newspaper published in the county and circulating in the city, or, if there is no such newspaper, such election resolution shall be printed in full and posted in three public places in such city not less than ten days nor more than thirty days prior to the date fixed for such election. At such election the ballot shall contain the words "for the bonds" and "against the bonds". Opposite each of said phrases shall be a hollow square, each side of which shall be not less than one-quarter inch nor more than one inch. The elector shall indicate his vote "for the bonds" or "against the bonds" by inserting a mark in the square opposite such phrase. It shall not be necessary to print any question or any other words or figures on any ballot, nor need the ballot be of any particular size, color, or quality, nor need sample ballots be printed, posted, or distributed. At or before the regular meeting of the council next succeeding the date of such election, such council shall canvass the returns and determine and declare the results of the election. Except as otherwise provided in this section, and as far as may be necessary or convenient, the manner of conducting such election, keeping the poll lists, counting and canvassing the votes, certifying the returns, declaring the results, and doing all acts relating to such election shall conform to the mode or method of procedure provided by the laws of the state of Colorado for the qualification of voters and the holding of general elections.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 508, § 11.

CSA:

C. 82, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-10.

Cross references:

For the general election laws, see article 1 of title 1.

29-4-111. Bonds not secured by taxes authorized by resolution.

The council may authorize the issuance of bonds not payable from or additionally secured by taxes by a resolution which shall state in substance:

The amount or maximum amount of bonds to be issued;

The housing projects for the financing of which such bonds are to be issued;

The rate or maximum rate of interest which such bonds are to bear;

A brief concise statement, which need not go into any detail other than the mere statement of the fact, showing the source of payment and security for such bonds.

Such bonds shall mature at such times, not to exceed sixty years from their respective dates, as the council may provide.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 509, § 12.

CSA:

C. 82, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-11.

29-4-112. Tax resolution - payment of bonds.

Before delivering any bonds payable from or additionally secured by taxes and authorized to be issued pursuant to this part 1, the council shall adopt a resolution, referred to in this part 1 as the "tax resolution", which shall recite in substance that adequate provision will be made for raising annually a tax upon all property subject to taxation by the city of a sum sufficient to pay the interest on and principal of such bonds as the same become due. A tax sufficient to pay, when due, such principal and such interest shall be levied annually and assessed, collected, and paid in like manner with the other taxes of such city and shall be in addition to and exclusive of the maximum of all other taxes which such city is authorized or required by law to levy and assess upon the property subject to taxation.

It is the duty of the tax collector of the county in which such city is located, upon the filing in the office of such county clerk of the county wherein such city is located of a duly certified copy of such tax resolution, to levy and assess a tax sufficient to pay the interest on and principal of such bonds as the same become due; but if the bonds are payable from taxes only in the event of a deficiency in revenues or are payable from taxes and additionally secured by a pledge of revenues and if the tax resolution so provides, then, in such events, the tax to be levied and assessed by such county clerk may be reduced by such amount and under such conditions as may be determined in such tax resolution. When for any reason all or any part of the principal of or interest on any bonds payable from or additionally secured by taxes and issued by any city pursuant to this part 1 is paid when due, there shall be levied and assessed by the county clerk and collected by the proper collecting officers a tax sufficient to pay the same.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 510, § 13.

CSA:

C. 82, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-12.

Cross references:

For the power of boards of county commissioners to levy taxes, see § 39-1-111.

29-4-113. Form of bonds - rate of interest.

The bonds of the city shall be issued in one or more series and shall bear such dates, bear interest at such rates, be in such denominations which may be made interchangeable, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment and at such places, and be subject to such terms and redemption, with or without premium, as the council by resolution or its trust indenture or mortgage may provide. The bonds authorized to be issued by this part 1 shall be sold at public sale held after notice of such sale published once at least ten days prior to such sale in a newspaper circulating in the city, if there is one, and in a financial newspaper published in the city of San Francisco, California, or in the city of Chicago, Illinois; except that such bonds may be sold to the federal government at private sale without any public advertisement. The bonds may be sold in such blocks as the council may by resolution determine, but no bonds shall be sold at less than par. The bonds may be purchased by the city at a price not more than the principal amount thereof plus the accrued interest, and all bonds so purchased shall be canceled. The bonds shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all the purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S., pertaining to investment securities.

The validity of the authorization and issuance of the bonds authorized under this part 1 shall not be dependent on or affected in any way by proceedings taken, contracts made, acts performed, or things done in connection with the construction of any housing project. Bonds issued under this part 1 bearing the signature of officers in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding obligations, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof any persons whose signatures appear thereon shall have ceased to be officers of the city issuing the same. Pending the authorization, preparation, execution, or delivery of the definitive bonds for the purpose of financing the construction of a housing project, interim certificates or other temporary obligations may be issued by the city to the purchaser of such bonds. Such interim certificates or other temporary obligations shall be in such form and contain such terms, conditions, and provisions as the council of the city issuing the same may determine.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 511, § 14.

CSA:

C. 82, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-13.

L. 70:

p. 111, § 6.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 218, § 58, effective July 16.

29-4-114. Provisions of bonds, mortgages, or trust indentures.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of any obligations under a lease, and in order to secure the payment of such bonds or obligations, the city has power:

To pledge by resolution, trust indenture, mortgage subject to the limitations imposed in this part 1, or other contract all or any part of the rents, fees, or revenues of its housing projects;

To covenant against mortgaging all or any part of its housing projects, then owned or thereafter acquired, or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon;

To covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any housing projects or any part thereof, or with respect to limitations on its right to undertake additional housing projects;

To covenant against pledging all or any part of the rents, fees, and revenues of housing projects to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence, or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon;

To provide for the release of property, rents, fees, and revenues from any pledge or mortgage, and to reserve rights and powers in or the right to dispose of property which is subject to a pledge or mortgage;

To covenant as to the bonds to be issued pursuant to any resolution, trust indenture, or other instrument, as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof;

To covenant as to what other or additional debt may be incurred by it to finance housing projects or otherwise;

To provide for the terms, form, registration, exchange, execution, and authentication of bonds;

To provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds;

To covenant that it warrants the title to the premises;

To covenant as to the fees and rentals to be charged, the amount, calculated as may be determined, to be raised each year or other period of time by fees, rentals, and other revenues, and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof;

To covenant as to the use of any or all of its housing projects;

To create or to authorize the creation of special funds in which there are segregated:

All the proceeds of any loan or grant;

All of the rents, fees, and revenues of any housing project or parts thereof;

All of the taxes collected for the payment of such bonds;

Any moneys held for the payment of the costs of operation and maintenance of such housing project or as a reserve for the meeting of contingencies in the operation and maintenance thereof;

Any moneys held for the payment of the principal and interest on its bonds or the sums due under its leases or as a reserve for such payment; and

Any moneys held for any other reserves or contingencies; and to covenant as to the use and disposal of the moneys held in such funds;

To redeem the bonds, to covenant for their redemption, and to provide the terms and conditions thereof;

To covenant against extending the time for the payment of bond interest, directly or indirectly, by any means or in any manner;

To prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holder of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

To covenant as to the maintenance of its housing projects, the replacement thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon, and the use and disposition of insurance moneys;

To vest in an obligee of the city the right, in the event of the failure of the city to observe or perform any covenant on its part, to cure any such default and to advance any moneys necessary for such purpose, and the moneys so advanced may be made an additional obligation of the city with such interest, security, and priority as may be provided in any trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or contract of the city with reference thereto;

To covenant and prescribe as to the events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition, or obligation;

To covenant to surrender possession of all or any part of any housing project in the event of default, as defined in the trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or contract with reference thereto, and to vest in an obligee the right, without judicial proceedings, to take possession and to use, operate, manage, and control such housing projects or any part thereof, and to collect and receive all rents, fees, and revenues arising therefrom in the same manner as the city and the authority might do, and to dispose of the moneys collected in accordance with the agreement of the city with such obligee;

To vest in a trustee the right to enforce any covenant made to secure, to pay, or, in relation to the bonds, to provide for the powers and duties of such trustee, to limit liabilities thereof, and to provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them may enforce any such covenant;

To make covenants in addition to the covenants expressly authorized by this section, of like or different character;

To execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this section or in the performance of its covenants or duties, which may contain such covenants and provisions, in addition to those above specified as the government or any purchaser of the bonds of the city may reasonably require;

To make such covenants and to do all such acts and things as are necessary, convenient, or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or in the absolute discretion of the city tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated in this section. It is the intention of this section to give the city power to do all things in the issuance of bonds and in the provision for their security that are not inconsistent with the constitution of Colorado, and no consent or approval of any judge or court shall be required thereof; but the city has no power to mortgage all or any part of its property, real or personal, except as provided in section 29-4-115.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 512, § 15.

CSA:

C. 82, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-14.

29-4-115. Mortgage when financed by government.

In connection with any housing project financed in whole or in part by a government, every city also has power to mortgage all or any part of such housing project, the construction of which was financed with the proceeds of its bonds or with such proceeds supplemented by the proceeds of a grant from the federal government, and by such mortgage:

To vest in a government the right, in the event of default as defined in such mortgage, to foreclose the mortgage through judicial proceedings or through the exercise of a power of sale without judicial proceedings as long as the government is the holder of any of the bonds secured by such mortgage;

To vest in a trustee the right, in the event of default as defined in such mortgage, to foreclose such mortgage through judicial proceedings or through the exercise of a power of sale without judicial proceedings, but only with the consent of the government which aided in financing the project;

To vest in an obligee other than a government the right, but only with the consent of the government which aided in financing the project involved, to foreclose such mortgage by judicial proceedings;

To vest in an obligee, including a government, the right in foreclosing any mortgage as aforesaid to foreclose such mortgage as to all or such part of the property covered by such mortgage as such obligee, in its absolute discretion, elects; such institution, prosecution, and conclusion of any such proceedings or the sale of such parts of the mortgaged property shall not affect in any manner or to any extent the lien of the mortgage on the parts of the mortgaged property not included in such proceedings or not sold.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 517, § 16.

CSA:

C. 82, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-15.

29-4-116. Remedies of an obligee of city.

Any obligee of the city has the right, in addition to all other rights which may be conferred on such obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

By mandamus, suit, action, or proceeding in law or equity, all of which may be joined in one action, to compel the performance by the city and any officer, agent, or employee of the city of every term, provision, and covenant contained in any trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or other agreement relating to a housing project to which the city is a party, and to require the carrying out of any or all covenants and agreements and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon the city by this part 1;

By suit, action, or proceeding in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful, or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of the city;

By suit, action, or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to cause possession of any housing project or any part thereof to be surrendered to any obligee having the right to such possession pursuant to any mortgage, lease, or contract with the city.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 518, § 17.

CSA:

C. 82, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-16.

29-4-117. Additional remedies.

Any city has power by its trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or other contract relating to a housing project to confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, leases, or other obligations, the right, in the event of default, as defined in such instrument:

By suit, action, or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to obtain the appointment of a receiver of any housing project of the city or any part thereof. If such receiver is appointed, he may enter and take possession of such project or any part thereof, operate and maintain the same, collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges arising therefrom in the same manner as the city or the authority might do, and shall keep all such moneys in a separate account and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of the city as the court directs.

By suit, action, or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to require the city and the officers thereof to account as if they were the trustees of an express trust.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 519, § 18.

CSA:

C. 82, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-17.

29-4-118. Remedies cumulative.

All the rights and remedies conferred by this part 1 shall be cumulative and in addition to all other rights and remedies that are conferred upon such obligee of the city by law or by any agreement with the city.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 519, § 19.

CSA:

C. 82, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-18.

29-4-119. Limitations on remedies of obligee.

No interest of the city in any housing project shall be subject to sale by the foreclosure of a mortgage thereon either through judicial proceedings or the exercise of a power of sale contained in such mortgage except in the case of mortgages not provided for in section 29-4-115. No judgment against a city shall be a charge upon the real or personal property of the city. The provisions of this section shall not apply to nor limit the rights of obligees to foreclose any of the mortgages of the city provided for in section 29-4-115, or to enforce any pledges or rights conferred by any contract, trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or other agreement of the city relating to a housing project by any appropriate suit, action, or proceeding.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 520, § 20.

CSA:

C. 82, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-19.

29-4-120. Foreclosure sale subject to government agreement.

Notwithstanding anything in this part 1 to the contrary, any purchaser at a sale of real or personal property constituting part of a housing project of a city pursuant to any foreclosure of a mortgage of the city shall obtain title subject to any contract between the authority and the government relating to the supervision by the government of the operation and maintenance of the property and the construction of improvements thereon.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 520, § 21.

CSA:

C. 82, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-20.

29-4-121. Action by resolution.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 1, all action required or authorized to be taken under this part 1 by the council of any city may be by resolution adopted by a majority of all the members of such council, which resolution may be adopted at the meeting of the council at which such resolution is introduced and shall take effect immediately upon such adoption. Except as otherwise provided in this part 1, no resolution under this part 1 need be published or posted, nor shall any such resolution be subject to veto by the chief executive officer of the city or presiding officer of a council.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 520, § 22.

CSA:

C. 82, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-21.

29-4-122. Tax exemptions.

In connection with any housing project, the city shall be exempt from the payment of any taxes or fees to the state or any subdivision thereof, or to any officer or employee of the state or any subdivision thereof. The property of the city constituting a part of any housing project shall be exempt from all taxes. Bonds, notes, debentures, and other evidences of indebtedness of a city issued under this article are declared to be issued for a public purpose and to be public instrumentalities and, together with interest thereon, shall be exempt from taxes.

A city is also exempt from the payment of any special assessments to the state or any subdivision thereof which it otherwise would be required to pay because of its ownership of a housing project. The property of a city used for housing purposes shall be exempt from all local and municipal special assessments. All property leased to the city for housing purposes shall likewise be exempt from special assessments.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 521, § 24.

CSA:

C. 82, § 27.

L. 37:

p. 665, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-22.

29-4-123. Supplemental nature of article.

The powers conferred by this part 1 shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law and not in substitution for the powers conferred by any other law. Bonds may be issued under this part 1 for any housing project notwithstanding that any other law may provide for the issuance of bonds by the city or an authority for like purposes and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, or procedural provisions contained in any other law. Bonds may be issued under this part 1 notwithstanding any debt or other limitation prescribed by any other law. Any proceedings taken prior to April 19, 1935, by any municipality relating to the subject matters of this part 1, whether or not commenced under any other law, may be continued under this part 1, or, at the option of the council, may be discontinued and new proceedings instituted under this part 1.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 521, § 25.

CSA:

C. 82, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 69-2-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-2-23.